Utah statutes.
78B-11-127.   Jurisdiction.

(1)  A court of this state having jurisdiction over the controversy and the parties may enforce an agreement to arbitrate.

(2)  An agreement to arbitrate providing for arbitration in this state confers exclusive jurisdiction on the court to enter judgment on an award under this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

